Florida, session 2026, HB525.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 267.07221, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
267.07221 Florida Museum of Black History Board of
Directors.—
(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the
work of the Florida Museum of Black History Task Force in
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb525-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 525 2026
selecting a location for the Florida Museum of Black History and
designating St. Johns County as the site for the museum. It is
further the intent of the Legislature, under the authority
provided in s. 267.0722(7), to establish a board of directors to
oversee the commission, construction, operation, and
administration of the museum.
(2)(a) The Florida Museum of Black History Board of
Directors is established within the division and shall be
composed of the following members:
1. Three individuals appointed by the Governor, one of
whom shall serve as chair.
2. Three individuals appointed by the President of the
Senate.
3. Two members of the Senate, appointed by the President
of the Senate and serving ex officio.
4. Three individuals appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
5. Two member of the House of Representatives, appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and serving ex
officio.
(b) Appointments must be made no later than July 31, 2026.
Members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (a)1., 2., and 4.
may not hold any state or local elective office while serving on
the board. Vacancies on the board must be filled in the same
manner as the initial appointments.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb525-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 525 2026
(3) The board shall work jointly with the Foundation for
the Museum of Black History, Inc., a nonprofit organization
created to support the creation of the museum.
(4) The St. Johns County Board of County Commissioners
shall provide administrative assistance and staffing to the
board until the project planning, design, and engineering are
completed.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb525-00